Nebraska, session 109, LB1182.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB1182 LB1182
2026 2026
Section 1. (1) Commencing with the 2027-28 school year, the annual
minimum base salary for any certificated teacher employed on a full-time
basis to teach by a public school district in Nebraska shall be fifty
thousand dollars.
(2) Such minimum base salary shall apply to all certificated
teachers, regardless of years of experience or educational attainment.
Nothing in this section shall prevent a school district from paying a
teacher more than the minimum base salary established in subsection (1)
of this section, or from establishing salary schedules that reward
experience, advanced education, or performance above this minimum.
(3) Beginning with the 2029-30 school year, and biennially
thereafter, the minimum base salary established in subsection (1) of this
section shall be adjusted by the percentage change in Nebraska's total
state General Fund receipts for the two-year period ending on December 31
of the preceding year, with a minimum adjustment of zero percent. The
base salary shall not be reduced below the previous year's base salary.
The adjusted minimum base salary shall be rounded to the nearest one
hundred dollars. The State Department of Education shall annually publish
the adjusted minimum base salary by March 1.
Sec. 2. (1) It is the intent of the Legislature to establish a
public education funding system based on block grant funding for
foundation aid and salary support and to adjust the education funding
system provided in the Tax Equity and Educational Opportunities Support
Act to incorporate such block grant funding. The newly established
funding system shall provide each public school district with a quarterly
block grant beginning July 1, 2027. The amount of each district's
quarterly block grant shall be determined by a formula established by the
Legislature based on factors including, but not limited to, student
enrollment and the minimum base salary for certificated teachers
established in section 1 of this act.
(2) The State Board of Education shall adopt and promulgate rules
-2-

LB1182 LB1182
2026 2026
and regulations necessary to implement and enforce sections 1 and 2 of
this act, including procedures for monitoring district compliance and
reporting on teacher salaries and student counts.
Sec. 3. Section 79-1001, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
79-1001 Sections 79-1001 to 79-1033 shall be known and may be cited
as the Tax Equity and Educational Opportunities Support Act. It is the
intent of the Legislature that adjustments be made to the Tax Equity and
Educational Opportunities Support Act beginning with school fiscal year
2027-28 to provide foundation aid and salary support for public school
districts via block grant funding pursuant to section 2 of this act.
Sec. 4. If any section in this act or any part of any section is
declared invalid or unconstitutional, the declaration shall not affect
the validity or constitutionality of the remaining portions.
Sec. 5. Original section 79-1001, Reissue Revised Statutes of
Nebraska, is repealed.
-3-